Illinois, session 104th, SB1976.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4Article 5. Workers' Rights and Worker Safety Act 5    Section 5-1. Short title. 6    (a) This Article may be cited as the Workers' Rights and 7Worker Safety Act. 8    (b) As used in this Article, "this Act" refers to this 9Article.  10    Section 5-5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 11    "Employee" has the meaning set forth in Section 2 of the 12Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act. 13    "Employer" means any individual, partnership, association, 14corporation, limited liability company, business trust, 15governmental, or quasi-governmental body that employs one or 16more employees. "Employer" does not include the federal 17government. 18    "Federal coal mine safety law" means the Federal Coal Mine 19Health and Safety Act, 30 U.S.C. 801 et seq., and federal 20regulations adopted under that statute, Subchapter O of 21Chapter I of Title 30 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as 22these federal statutes and regulations exist on April 28,   SB1976 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b12025.2    "Federal wage and hour law" means the federal Fair Labor 3Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq., and federal regulations 4adopted under that statute, Subtitle B of Chapter V of Title 29 5of the Code of Federal Regulations, as these federal statutes 6and regulations exist on April 28, 2025.7    "State agency" means the Department of Labor or the 8Department of Natural Resources. 9    "Stringent" means a law, rule, or standard's overall 10effectiveness in protecting the rights and safety of workers. 11A law, rule, or standard is considered to be more stringent if 12it imposes a safety requirement or obligation on employers 13that is stricter or more demanding than what is otherwise 14imposed by law or if it provides for greater rights, benefits, 15remedies, or procedures for employees than what is otherwise 16provided by law. 17    Section 5-10. Operative provisions for wage and hour laws 18and coal mine safety laws. 19    (a) Except as authorized by State law enacted after April 2028, 2025, a State agency may not amend or revise the State 21agency's rules in a manner that is less stringent in its 22protection of workers' rights or worker safety than the 23requirements established under federal wage and hour law or 24federal coal mine safety law, as the laws exist on April 28, 252025.   SB1976 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1    (b) Nothing in this Act shall limit the authority of a 2State agency to establish workers' rights and worker safety 3requirements for this State that are more stringent than those 4provided under federal wage and hour law or federal coal mine 5safety law, as the laws exist on April 28, 2025.6    (c) If a federal wage and hour law or federal coal mine 7safety law is repealed, revoked, or amended in any manner that 8results in the federal protections of workers' rights or 9worker safety becoming less stringent, or if the applicable 10federal agency issues a new interpretation of the federal wage 11and hour law or federal coal mine safety law through an opinion 12letter, ruling letter, administrative interpretation, program 13policy manual, or program policy letter that results in the 14federal protections of workers' rights or worker safety 15becoming less stringent, and a State agency does not already 16have corresponding rules in place that are at least as 17stringent as the federal wage and hour law or federal coal mine 18safety law being repealed, revoked, amended, or newly 19interpreted, the applicable State agency or agencies shall, as 20soon as practical, adopt a rule that incorporates the federal 21wage and hour law or federal coal mine safety law being 22repealed, revoked, amended, or newly interpreted as a minimum 23requirement for this State. The State agency may also take 24additional action to maintain the protection of workers' 25rights or worker safety, including, but not limited to, 26recommending legislation and developing policy. Any   SB1976 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1requirement adopted by operation of this Section may be 2enforced through the existing enforcement procedures 3established under State law for violations of the Minimum Wage 4Law or the Coal Mining Act, as applicable, including 5applicable penalties and remedies. 6    Section 5-15. Implementation and reporting. Each State 7agency shall undertake all feasible efforts using the State 8agency's authority under State and federal law to implement 9and enforce this Act. Each State agency that takes actions to 10enforce this Act shall submit a report to the General Assembly 11at least once each year describing the State agency's 12compliance with this Act. The report to the General Assembly 13shall be filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives 14and the Secretary of the Senate in electronic form only, in the 15manner that the Clerk and the Secretary shall direct. 16    Section 5-20. Rulemaking authority. In order to comply 17with the requirements of this Act, the agency head of each 18applicable State agency, or the agency head's authorized 19representative, may adopt all necessary rules, in accordance 20with the requirements of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 21Act, to protect the rights and safety of workers. 22    Section 5-25. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 23severable. If any provision of this Act or its application is   SB1976 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other 2provisions or applications that can be given effect without 3the invalid provision or application. 4Article 10. Safe and Healthy Workplace Act 5    Section 10-1. Short title. 6    (a) This Article may be cited as the Illinois Safe and 7Healthy Workplace Act. 8    (b) As used in this Article, "this Act" refers to this 9Article. 10    Section 10-5. Scope. 11    (a) The grant of authority and obligations in this Act 12apply and extend only to occupational safety or health issues 13with respect to which no standard is in effect under section 6 14of the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act, 29 U.S.C. 15651 et seq. The grant of authority and obligations in this Act 16do not apply to occupational safety or health issues with 17respect to which a standard is in effect under section 6 of the 18federal Occupational Safety and Health Act, 29 U.S.C. 651 et 19seq.20    (b) This Act does not apply to the development or 21enforcement of occupational health and safety standards in the 22public sector set forth in the Illinois Occupational Safety 23and Health Act.   SB1976 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1    Section 10-10. Operative provisions for the development of 2occupational health and safety rules in the private sector 3where no federal standard exists. If, after the effective date 4of this Act, a federal occupational health or safety standard, 5as defined under 29 U.S.C. 651 et seq., is repealed or revoked 6and no federal standard exists regulating that occupational 7safety or health issue for any employer that is not subject to 8the Occupational Safety and Health Act, the Illinois 9Department of Labor shall, as soon as practical, adopt rules 10as the Director of the Illinois Department of Labor deems 11necessary to incorporate the federal occupational health or 12safety standard that was repealed or revoked to address that 13occupational safety or health issue. No rules adopted by the 14Illinois Department of Labor shall be construed to apply to 15the federal government as an employer. 16    Section 10-15. Rulemaking authority. 17    (a) In order to accomplish the objectives of this Act and 18to carry out the duties prescribed by this Act, the Director of 19Labor may adopt rules, in accordance with the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act, necessary to implement the 21provisions of this Act. In developing rules, the Department of 22Labor shall consider the federal occupational health or safety 23standard being repealed or revoked as a minimum standard for 24private employers in this State.  SB1976 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1    (b) Any standard adopted by operation of this Section may 2be enforced through Section 10-20 of this Act. 3    Section 10-20. Right of action. 4    (a) As used in this Section, "interested party" means an 5organization that monitors or is attentive to compliance with 6public or worker safety laws. 7    (b) An aggrieved employee, an interested party, or the 8Department of Labor may bring a civil action against a private 9employer to enforce any rule adopted by the Department of 10Labor in accordance with this Act.11    (c) An action brought under this Section must be brought 12no later than 3 years after the date of the alleged violation 13and, if brought by an aggrieved employee, may be brought by one 14or more employees on behalf of themselves and other employees 15similarly situated. 16    (d) In any action brought under this Section the 17Department of Labor shall be represented by the Office of the 18Attorney General. 19    Section 10-25. Relief and penalties. 20    (a) An aggrieved employee, interested party, or the 21Department of Labor prevailing in a civil action under Section 2210-20 or any rules or standards adopted under this Act shall be 23entitled to all appropriate relief, including declaratory and 24injunctive relief and any other appropriate relief as deemed   SB1976 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1necessary by the court to make the employee or employees 2whole. The court shall award a prevailing employee or 3interested party reasonable attorney's fees and costs.4    (b) With respect to any occupational health and safety 5rules and standards in the private sector where no federal 6standard exists and for which no other civil penalties already 7exist, the court may impose civil penalties as follows: 8        (1) an employer found to be in violation of the rule or 9    standard may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than 10    $1,000 per violation; 11        (2) an employer that repeatedly violates the rule or 12    standard may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than 13    $10,000 per violation; and14        (3) an employer that willfully violates the rule or 15    standard, or who demonstrates plain indifference to any 16    provision of the rule or standard, may be assessed a civil 17    penalty of not more than $70,000 per violation. 18    Section 10-30. Severability. The provisions of this Act 19are severable. If any provision of this Act or its application 20is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other 21provisions or applications that can be given effect without 22the invalid provision or application. 23Article 15. Amendatory Provisions   SB1976 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1    Section 15-5. The Occupational Safety and Health Act is 2amended by changing Section 25 as follows: 3    (820 ILCS 219/25)4    Sec. 25. Occupational safety and health standards.5    (a) All federal occupational safety and health standards 6which the United States Secretary of Labor has promulgated or 7modified in accordance with the federal Occupational Safety 8and Health Act of 1970 and which are in effect on the effective 9date of this Act shall be and are hereby made rules of the 10Department unless the Director promulgates an alternate 11standard that is at least as effective in providing safe and 12healthful employment and places of employment as a federal 13standard. Before developing and adopting an alternate standard 14or modifying or revoking an existing standard, the Director 15must consider factual information that includes:16        (1) Expert technical knowledge.17        (2) Input from interested persons, including 18    employers, employees, recognized standards-producing 19    organizations, and the public.20    (b) All federal occupational safety and health standards 21which the United States Secretary of Labor promulgates or 22modifies in accordance with the federal Occupational Safety 23and Health Act of 1970 on or after the effective date of this 24Act, unless revoked by the Secretary of Labor, shall become 25rules of the Department within 6 months after their federal   SB1976 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1promulgation date, unless there has been in effect in this 2State at the time of the promulgation or modification of the 3federal standard an alternate State standard that is at least 4as effective in providing safe and healthful employment and 5places of employment as a federal standard. The alternate 6State standard, if not currently contained in the Department's 7rules, shall not become effective, however, unless the 8Department, within 45 days after the federal promulgation 9date, files with the office of the Secretary of State in 10Springfield, Illinois, a certified copy of the rule as 11provided in the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 12    (c) If, after April 28, 2025, the United States Secretary 13of Labor revokes or repeals a previously promulgated federal 14Occupational Safety and Health Act standard or if the United 15States Secretary of Labor amends a previously promulgated 16federal Occupational Safety and Health Act standard or issues 17a standard interpretation for a previously promulgated federal 18Occupational Safety and Health Act standard that results in 19the federal standard becoming less effective in providing safe 20and healthful employment and places of employment, the 21Illinois Department of Labor shall, as soon as practical and 22in accordance with the process set forth in this Section, 23adopt a standard that incorporates the federal occupational 24health or safety standard as it existed prior to being 25repealed, revoked, amended, or newly interpreted and addresses 26the occupational safety or health issue that the repealed,   SB1976 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07813 SPS 17859 b1revoked, amended, or newly interpreted federal Occupational 2Safety and Health Act standard had addressed. 3(Source: P.A. 102-705, eff. 1-1-23.) 4Article 99. Effective Date 5    Section 99-99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.